test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VV_IMP_boodwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI+Imp - VV - boodwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #NO TEMPLATE
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: boodwen
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: boodweg
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: boodwedaa
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Del+2Sg: boodwekan
     #boodwe+VAI+Imp+Del+21Pl: UNKNOWN
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Del+2Pl: boodwekeg
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+2Sg: boodweke
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+2Pl: boodwekego
     boodwe+VAI+Imp+Neg+21Pl: boodwesiidaa
